src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_luottaat_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - luottaat  - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     luottaat+V+Inf: luottaat
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luotan
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luotat
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luottaa
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luotama
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luotatta
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: luotethaan
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luotin
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: luotit
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luotti
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luotima
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luotitta
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luotethiin
     luottaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: luottanu
     luottaat+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: luotettu
     luottaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: luottanheet
     luottaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: luottaava
     luottaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: luottaavat
     luottaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: luotettava
     luottaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: luotettavat
     
     luottaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: luottaisin
     luottaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: luottaisit
     luottaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: luottais
     luottaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: luottaisimma
     luottaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: luottaisitta
     luottaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: luotettais
     luottaat+V+Pass+Cond: luotettais
     
     luottaat+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: luota
     luottaat+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: luottakkaa
     
     luottaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: luottamassa
     luottaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: luottamasta
     luottaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: luottamhaan
     luottaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: luottamalla
     luottaat+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: luottamatta
